Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5020A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5020A. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a fund for the Oklahoma Health Care Authority to be
designated the "Rate Preservation Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of monies designated to the fund by law. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Authority for the sole purpose of
maintaining reimbursement rates to providers purposes described in
subsection B of this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment. The
Administrator of the Authority may request the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services to transfer monies

between the Rate Preservation Fund and any other fund of the
Authority as needed for the expenditure of funds.
B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority is authorized to budget
and expend monies from the Rate Preservation Fund as follows:
1. For maintaining reimbursement rates to providers in the
event of a decrease in the state's Federal Medical Assistance
Percentage rate; and
2. Subject to the approval of the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services, the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority may transfer up to one-third (1/3) of the balance of the
Rate Preservation Fund in any given state fiscal year to other funds
of the Authority to meet cash flow needs of the state's Medicaid
program, so long as the monies are transferred back to the Rate
Preservation Fund prior to the end of the state fiscal year in which
they were originally transferred.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2782 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2782 Page 3